zh-CN: 胶带用途: 边缘装饰; 通用; 握把整理; 保护; 增强旋转; 减震; 重量调节; 其他
vi: Mục đích sử dụng băng keo: Trang trí cạnh; Đa dụng; Hoàn thiện tay cầm; Bảo vệ; Tăng độ xoáy; Giảm rung; Chỉnh trọng lượng; Khác
en: Tape purpose: Edge decoration; General purpose; Grip finishing; Protection; Spin enhancement; Vibration dampening; Weight tuning; Other
pt-BR: Finalidade da fita: Decoração de bordas; Uso geral; Acabamento de grip; Proteção; Aprimoramento de efeito (spin); Amortecimento de vibração; Ajuste de peso; Outro
ko: 테이프 용도: 테두리 장식; 다목적; 그립 마감; 보호; 스핀 향상; 진동 감쇠; 무게 조정; 기타
de: Zweck des Tapes: Kantenverzierung; Allzweck; Griffabschluss; Schutz; Spin-Verbesserung; Vibrationsdämpfung; Gewichtsanpassung; Sonstige
ro-RO: Scopul benzii: Decorare margini; Uz general; Finisare prindere; Protecție; Îmbunătățirea rotației; Amortizarea vibrațiilor; Ajustarea greutății; Altele
tr: Bant kullanım amacı: Kenar dekorasyonu; Genel amaçlı; Kavrama bitişi; Koruma; Spin artırma; Titreşim sönümleme; Ağırlık ayarlama; Diğer
nl: Doel van tape: Randdecoratie; Algemeen gebruik; Gripafwerking; Bescherming; Spinverbetering; Trillingsdemping; Gewichtsaanpassing; Overig
hu: Szalag célja: Éldíszítés; Általános célú; Markolatlezárás; Védelem; Pördületnövelés; Rezgéscsillapítás; Súlyhangolás; Egyéb
pl: Przeznaczenie taśmy: Dekoracja krawędzi; Ogólnego przeznaczenia; Wykończenie chwytu; Ochrona; Zwiększenie rotacji; Tłumienie wibracji; Regulacja wagi; Inne
pt-PT: Finalidade da fita: Decoração de extremidades; Fins gerais; Acabamento de pega; Proteção; Aumento de rotação; Amortecimento de vibrações; Ajuste de peso; Outro
sk-SK: Účel použitia pásky: Ozdoba okraja; Všeobecné použitie; Úprava úchopu; Ochrana; Zlepšenie rotácie; Tlmenie vibrácií; Úprava hmotnosti; Iné
fi: Teipin tarkoitus: Reunan koristelu; Yleiskäyttö; Gripin viimeistely; Suojaus; Kierteen lisäys; Tärinänvaimennus; Painon säätö; Muu
cs: Účel pásky: Dekorace okrajů; Obecné použití; Zakončení omotávky; Ochrana; Vylepšení spinu; Tlumení vibrací; Úprava hmotnosti; Jiné
es: Propósito de la cinta: Decoración de bordes; Uso general; Acabado de agarre; Protección; Mejora de efecto; Amortiguación de vibraciones; Ajuste de peso; Otro
it: Scopo del nastro: Decorazione del bordo; Uso generale; Finitura impugnatura; Protezione; Miglioramento dello spin; Smorzamento delle vibrazioni; Regolazione del peso; Altro
nb: Formål med teip: Kantdekorasjon; Generelt formål; Grepavslutning; Beskyttelse; Spinnforbedring; Vibrasjonsdemping; Vektjustering; Annet
ja: テープ目的: エッジ装飾; 汎用; グリップ仕上げ; 保護; スピン強化; 振動減衰; 重量調整; その他
sv: Tejpens ändamål: Kantdekoration; Allmänt syfte; Greppfinish; Skydd; Spinnförbättring; Vibrationsdämpning; Viktjustering; Annat
ru: Назначение ленты: Украшение краёв; Общего назначения; Обмотка рукоятки; Защита; Улучшение вращения; Гашение вибрации; Настройка веса; Другое
hr-HR: Svrha trake: Dekoracija rubova; Opća namjena; Završna obrada hvatišta; Zaštita; Poboljšanje rotacije; Prigušivanje vibracija; Prilagodba težine; Ostalo
sl-SI: Namen traku: Okrasitev robov; Splošna uporaba; Zaključek oprijema; Zaščita; Povečanje rotacije; Blaženje vibracij; Uravnavanje teže; Drugo
fr: Utilisation du ruban adhésif: Décoration des bords; Usage général; Finition de la prise; Protection; Amélioration de l’effet; Amortissement des vibrations; Ajustement du poids; Autre
bg-BG: Предназначение на лентата: Декорация на ръбове; Общо предназначение; Завършване на грипа; Защита; Подобряване на фалца; Омекотяване на вибрациите; Регулиране на тежестта; Друго
lt-LT: Juostos paskirtis: Krašto dekoravimas; Bendroji paskirtis; Rankenos apdaila; Apsauga; Sukimosi stiprinimas; Vibracijos slopinimas; Svorio reguliavimas; Kita
th: วัตถุประสงค์ของเทป: ตกแต่งขอบ; อเนกประสงค์; พันปิดด้ามจับ; ป้องกัน; เพิ่มการหมุน; ลดแรงสั่นสะเทือน; ปรับน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
da: Formål med tape: Kantdekoration; Generelle formål; Grebsafslutning; Beskyttelse; Forbedring af spin; Vibrationsdæmpning; Vægtjustering; Andet
zh-TW: 膠帶用途: 邊緣裝飾; 一般用途; 握把收邊; 保護; 提升旋轉; 減震; 重量調整; 其他
el: Σκοπός ταινίας: Διακόσμηση άκρων; Γενικής χρήσης; Φινίρισμα λαβής; Προστασία; Ενίσχυση περιστροφής; Απόσβεση κραδασμών; Ρύθμιση βάρους; Άλλο